latest_version/apertium_ori_new1.dix
<pardef n="W/A__v">

<e><p><l>Ae</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Au</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Au</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aa</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aa</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AAnwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ae</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AAnwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AAnwe</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ili</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ilu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ilu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ila</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ila</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ile</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ilA</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ile</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ile</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ibi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ibu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ibu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iba</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iba</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ibe</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iba</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ibe</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ibe</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>AipAre</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:pAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AipAru</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:pAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AipAru</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:pAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AipAra</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:pAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AipAra</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:pAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AipAranwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:pAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AipAre</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:pAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AipAranwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:pAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AipAranwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:pAre"/></r></p></e>





    <!-- with light verb "jA" -->
<e><p><l>AiyAe</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAa</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAa</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAAnwu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAe</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAAnwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAAnwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAuCi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAuCu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAuCu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAuCa</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAuCa</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAuCanwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAuCi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAuCanwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAuCanwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAiCi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAiCu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAiCu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAiCa</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAiCa</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAiCanwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAiCi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAiCanwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AiyAiCanwi</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aigali</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aigalu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aigalu</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aigala</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aigala</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aigale</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AigalA</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aigale</l><r>A<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="WA"><i>W</i><par n="W/A__v"/></e>
